Hawaii statutes.
[§78-1.5] Definitions. As used herein,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms "appointing
authority", "chief executive", "director",
"employee", "employer", and "jurisdiction" shall
have the same meaning as those terms are defined in section 76-11. [L 2000, c
253, pt of §74]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next